Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1668.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 103-G. Retrofitting residential high-rise buildings with automatic fire sprinkler systems.A city of the first class shall have the authority to determine the participation in a property tax abatement program or real property tax relief program for the purpose of incentivizing investment in retrofitting residential high-rise buildings with automatic fire sprinkler systems and associated monitoring or detection devices.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1668PN2044 - 2 - 123456789101112131415